North Dakota, session 69, HB1373.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new section to chapter 12.1-16 of the North Dakota Century Code is created
and enacted as follows:
Definitions - Application .
1. As used in this chapter:
a. "Human being" includes an unborn child.
b. "Unborn child" means an individual living human child before birth from the
beginning of biological development at the moment of fertilization upon the fusion
of a human spermatozoon with a human ovum.
2. This chapter does not apply to the unintentional death of an unborn child resulting
from:
a. Acts performed under the usual and customary standards of medical practice
during diagnostic testing;
b. A procedure undertaken to save the life of a mother when accompanied by
reasonable steps to save the life of the unborn child; or
c. Spontaneous miscarriage.
SECTION 2. A new section to chapter 12.1-17 of the North Dakota Century Code is created
and enacted as follows:
Page No. 1 25.0415.05000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
Definitions - Application .
1. As used in this chapter:
a. "Human being" includes an unborn child.
b. "Unborn child" means an individual living human child before birth from the
beginning of biological development at the moment of fertilization upon the fusion
of a human spermatozoon with a human ovum.
2. This chapter does not apply to the unintentional injury of an unborn child resulting
from:
a. Acts performed under the usual and customary standards of medical practice
during diagnostic testing;
b. A procedure undertaken to save the life of a mother when accompanied by
reasonable steps to save the life of the unborn child; or
c. Spontaneous miscarriage.
SECTION 3. A new section to chapter 32-21 of the North Dakota Century Code is created
and enacted as follows:
Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
1. "Person" includes an unborn child.
2. "Unborn child" means an individual living human child before birth from the beginning
of biological development at the moment of fertilization upon the fusion of a human
spermatozoon with a human ovum.
SECTION 4. A new section to chapter 32-21 of the North Dakota Century Code is created
and enacted as follows:
Exceptions.
This chapter does not apply to the unintentional injury of an unborn child resulting from:
1. Acts performed under the usual and customary standards of medical practice during
diagnostic testing;
2. A procedure undertaken to save the life of a mother when accompanied by reasonable
steps to save the life of the unborn child; or
3. Spontaneous miscarriage.
Page No. 2 25.0415.05000